New Mexico, session 2026, HB94.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. Section 61-2-2 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1973, Chapter 353, Section 2, as amended) is amended to read: "61-2-2. DEFINITIONS.--As used in the Optometry Act: A. "practice of optometry" means: (1) the employment of any subjective or objective means or methods, including but not limited to the use of lenses, prisms, autorefractors or other automated testing devices, and includes the prescription or administration of drugs for the purpose of diagnosing the visual defects or abnormal conditions of the human eye and its adnexa; (2) the employing, adapting or prescribing of preventive or corrective measures, including but not limited to lenses, prisms, contact or corneal lenses or other optical appliances, ocular exercises, vision therapy, vision training and vision rehabilitation services, and includes the prescription or administration of all drugs rational for the correction, relief or referral of visual defects or abnormal conditions of the human eye and its adnexa; and (3) does not include the use of surgery or injections in the treatment of eye diseases except for the use of the following types of in-office [minor] surgical procedures: (a) non-laser removal, destruction or drainage of superficial eyelid lesions and conjunctival cysts; (b) removal of nonperforating foreign bodies from the cornea, conjunctiva and eyelid; (c) non-laser corneal debridement, culture, scrape or anterior puncture, not including removal of pterygium, corneal biopsy or removal of corneal neoplasias; (d) removal of eyelashes; [and] (e) probing, dilation, irrigation or closure of the tear drainage structures of the eyelid; scalpel use is to be applied only for the purpose of use on the skin surrounding the eye; (f) laser application to the lens capsule in the treatment of capsular clouding or other defects; and (g) laser application to structures within the ocular anterior segment for the prevention or treatment of glaucoma, including laser trabeculoplasty and laser peripheral iridotomy; B. "ophthalmic lens" means a lens that has a spherical, cylindrical or prismatic value, is ground pursuant to a prescription and is intended to be used as eyeglasses; C. "contact lens" means a lens to be worn on the anterior segment of the human eye; D. "prescription" means a written order by an optometrist or a physician for an individual patient for: (1) ophthalmic lenses; (2) contact lenses; or (3) a pharmaceutical agent that is regulated pursuant to the New Mexico Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act; E. "eyeglasses" means an exterior optical device using ophthalmic lenses for the correction or relief of disturbances in and anomalies of human vision; and F. "board" means the board of optometry." SECTION 2. Section 61-2-6 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1973, Chapter 353, Section 5, as amended) is amended to read: "61-2-6. OPTOMETRY BOARD ORGANIZATION--MEETINGS--COMPENSATION--POWERS AND DUTIES.-- A. The board shall annually elect a chair, a vice chair and a secretary-treasurer; each shall serve until a successor is elected and qualified. B. The board shall meet at least annually for the purpose of examining candidates for licensure. Special meetings may be called by the chair and shall be called upon the written request of a majority of the board members. A majority of the board members currently serving constitutes a quorum. C. Members of the board may be reimbursed as provided in the Per Diem and Mileage Act but shall receive no other compensation, perquisite or allowance. D. The board has the authority to determine what constitutes the practice of optometry in accordance with the provisions of the Optometry Act and has jurisdiction to exercise any other powers and duties pursuant to that act. The board may issue advisory opinions and declaratory rulings pursuant to that act and rules promulgated in accordance with the State Rules Act, but shall not expand the scope of practice of optometry beyond the provisions of the Optometry Act. E. The board shall: (1) administer and enforce the provisions of the Optometry Act; (2) promulgate in accordance with the State Rules Act, all rules for the implementation and enforcement of the provisions of the Optometry Act; (3) adopt and use a seal; (4) administer oaths and take testimony on matters within the board's jurisdiction; (5) keep an accurate record of meetings, receipts and disbursements; (6) keep a record of examinations held, together with the names and addresses of persons taking the examinations and the examination results. Within thirty days after an examination, the board shall give written notice to each applicant examined of the results of the examination as to the respective applicant; (7) certify as passing each applicant who obtains a grade of at least seventy-five percent on each subject upon which the applicant is examined; providing that an applicant failing may apply for re-examination at the next scheduled examination date; (8) keep a book of registration in which the name, address and license number of licensees shall be recorded, together with a record of license renewals, suspensions and revocations; (9) grant, deny, renew, suspend or revoke licenses to practice optometry in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Licensing Act for any cause stated in the Optometry Act; (10) develop and administer: (a) qualifications for certification for the use of pharmaceutical agents as authorized in Section 61-2-10.2 NMSA 1978, including minimum educational requirements and examination, as required by Section 61-2-10.2 NMSA 1978 and provide the board of pharmacy with an annual list of optometrists certified to use pharmaceutical agents as authorized in Section 61-2-10.2 NMSA 1978; and (b) credentialing requirements for the performance of procedures involving the use of a laser; and (11) provide for the suspension of an optometrist's license for sixty days upon a determination of use of pharmaceutical agents without prior certification in accordance with Section 61-2-10.2 NMSA 1978, after proper notice and an opportunity to be heard before the board." SECTION 3. A new section of the Optometry Act is enacted to read: "[NEW MATERIAL] LASER PROCEDURES--OPTOMETRIST CREDENTIALING--REPORTING.-- A. Unless an optometrist obtains credentialing from the board, an optometrist shall not perform a laser application to: (1) a lens capsule to treat capsular clouding or other capsular defects; or (2) structures within the ocular anterior segment for the prevention or treatment of glaucoma, including laser trabeculoplasty and laser peripheral iridotomy. B. The board shall issue an optometrist the credentials to perform the procedures listed in Subsection A of this section if the optometrist: (1) completes one of the following education and examination requirements: (a) graduation from an accredited college or university of optometry in 2026 or any year thereafter and passage of a standardized national examination approved by the board; or (b) completion of a training course accredited by a college of optometry, osteopathy or medicine and approved by the board that provides at least thirty-two hours of laser-application training; and (2) demonstrates successful performance of any of the following series of procedures on live human patients under the direct, in-person supervision of a licensed ophthalmologist or optometrist licensed or certified to perform the procedures listed in Subsection A of this section: (a) five yttrium aluminum garnet laser capsulotomies; (b) five selective laser trabeculoplasties; or (c) four laser peripheral iridotomies. C. An optometrist shall report to the board, in a form and manner prescribed by the board, an adverse outcome that results from the optometrist's performance of a procedure listed in Subsection A of this section within ten days of occurrence." SECTION 4. Section 61-2-15 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1973, Chapter 353, Section 13, as amended) is amended to read: "61-2-15. EXEMPTIONS.-- A. Except for the provisions of [Section] Sections 61-2-14.1 and 61-2-16 NMSA 1978 and as provided in this subsection, the Optometry Act does not apply to a licensed physician or a person, clinic or program under [his] the licensed physician's responsible supervision and control, provided that the person, clinic or program under the responsible supervision and control of the licensed physician shall not use either loose or fixed trial lenses for the sole purpose of determining the prescription for eyeglasses or contact lenses. B. Except as provided in Sections 61-2-2, 61-2-14, 61-2-16 and 61-2-17 NMSA 1978, the Optometry Act does not apply to a person selling eyeglasses who does not represent [himself] the person's own self as being qualified to detect or correct ocular anomalies and who does not traffic upon assumed skill in adapting ophthalmic lenses to the eyes."